Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 2. Judicial Proceedings

§ 201.
Role of court in administration of trust.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust’s administration, including a request for instructions and an action to declare rights.

Upon motion of any party in a probate action concerning the administration of a trust under the provisions of this title, the presiding probate judge shall permit an appeal to be taken to the Superior Court from any interlocutory order or ruling if the judge finds that the order or ruling involves a controlling question of law as to which there is substantial ground for difference of opinion and that an immediate appeal may materially advance the termination of the litigation.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

While the Uniform Trust Code encourages the resolution of disputes without resort to the courts by providing such options as the nonjudicial settlement authorized by Section 111, the court is always available to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by interested persons. The jurisdiction of the court with respect to trust matters is inherent and historical and also includes the ability to act on its own initiative, to appoint a special master to investigate the facts of a case, and to provide a trustee with instructions even in the absence of an actual dispute.

Contrary to the trust statutes in some States, the Uniform Trust Code does not create a system of routine or mandatory court supervision. While subsection (b) authorizes a court to direct that a particular trust be subject to continuing court supervision, the court’s intervention will normally be confined to the particular matter brought before it.

Subsection (c) makes clear that the court’s jurisdiction may be invoked even absent an actual dispute. Traditionally, courts in equity have heard petitions for instructions and have issued declaratory judgments if there is a reasonable doubt as to the extent of the trustee’s powers or duties. The court will not ordinarily instruct trustees on how to exercise discretion, however.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts §§ 187, 259 (1959). This section does not limit the court’s equity jurisdiction. Beyond mentioning petitions for instructions and actions to declare rights, subsection (c) does not attempt to list the types of judicial proceedings involving trust administration that might be brought by a trustee or beneficiary. Such an effort is made in California Probate Code § 17200. Excluding matters not germane to the Uniform Trust Code, the California statute lists the following as items relating to the “internal affairs” of a trust: determining questions of construction; determining the existence or nonexistence of any immunity, power, privilege, duty, or right; determining the validity of a trust provision; ascertaining beneficiaries and determining to whom property will pass upon final or partial termination of the trust; settling accounts and passing upon the acts of a trustee, including the exercise of discretionary powers; instructing the trustee; compelling the trustee to report information about the trust or account to the beneficiary; granting powers to the trustee; fixing or allowing payment of the trustee’s compensation or reviewing the reasonableness of the compensation; appointing or removing a trustee; accepting the resignation of a trustee; compelling redress of a breach of trust by any available remedy; approving or directing the modification or termination of a trust; approving or directing the combination or division of trusts; and authorizing or directing transfer of a trust or trust property to or from another jurisdiction.

§ 202.
Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this State or by moving the principal place of administration to this State, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this State are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section clarifies that the courts of the principal place of administration have jurisdiction to enter orders relating to the trust that will be binding on both the trustee and beneficiaries. Consent to jurisdiction does not dispense with any required notice, however. With respect to jurisdiction over a beneficiary, the Comment to Uniform Probate Code § 7-103, upon which portions of this section are based, is instructive:

It also seems reasonable to require beneficiaries to go to the seat of the trust when litigation has been instituted there concerning a trust in which they claim beneficial interests, much as the rights of shareholders of a corporation can be determined at a corporate seat. The settlor has indicated a principal place of administration by its selection of a trustee or otherwise, and it is reasonable to subject rights under the trust to the jurisdiction of the Court where the trust is properly administered.

The jurisdiction conferred over the trustee and beneficiaries by this section does not preclude jurisdiction by courts elsewhere on some other basis. Furthermore, the fact that the courts in a new State acquire jurisdiction under this section following a change in a trust’s principal place of administration does not necessarily mean that the courts of the former principal place of administration lose jurisdiction, particularly as to matters involving events occurring prior to the transfer.

The jurisdiction conferred by this section is limited. Pursuant to subsection (b), until a distribution is made, jurisdiction over a beneficiary is limited to the beneficiary’s interests in the trust. Personal jurisdiction over a beneficiary is conferred only upon the making of a distribution. Subsection (b) also gives the court jurisdiction over other recipients of distributions. This would include individuals who receive distributions in the mistaken belief they are beneficiaries.

For a discussion of jurisdictional issues concerning trusts, see 5A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts §§ 556-573 (4th ed. 1989).

§ 203.
Subject matter jurisdiction.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings in this State brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court has concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of this State of other proceedings involving a trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section provides a means for distinguishing the jurisdiction of the court having primary jurisdiction for trust matters, whether denominated the probate court, chancery court, or by some other name, from other courts in a State that may on occasion resolve disputes concerning trusts. The section has been placed in brackets because the enacting jurisdiction may already address subject-matter jurisdiction by other statute or court rule. The topic also need not be addressed in States having unified court systems. For an explanation of types of proceedings which may be brought concerning the administration of a trust, see the Comment to Section 201.

§ 204.
Venue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, venue for a judicial proceeding involving a trust is in the probate district of this State in which the trust’s principal place of administration is or will be located and, if the trust is created by will and the estate is not yet closed, in the probate district in which the decedent’s estate is being administered.

If a trust has no trustee, venue for a judicial proceeding for the appointment of a trustee is in a probate district of this State in which a beneficiary resides, in a probate district in which any trust property is located, and if the trust is created by will, in the probate district in which the decedent’s estate was or is being administered.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This optional, bracketed section is made available for jurisdictions that conclude that venue for a judicial proceeding involving a trust is not adequately addressed in local rules of civil procedure. For jurisdictions enacting this section, general rules governing venue continue to apply in cases not covered by this section. This includes most proceedings where jurisdiction over a trust, trust property, or parties to a trust is based on a factor other than the trust’s principal place of administration. The general rules governing venue also apply when the principal place of administration of a trust is in another locale, but jurisdiction is proper in the enacting State.

§ 205.
Matters in equity.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may hear and determine in equity all matters relating to trusts in this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.